Maryland, session 2025, HB0340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–307.
(A) FOR THE PROTECTION OF THE HEALTH AND SAFETY OF THE STATE’S
CITIZENS AND ENVIRONMENT, IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT
A PUBLICLY TRADED ENTITY THAT DERIVES AT LEAST 50% OF ITS REVENUES FROM
COAL, OIL, OR GAS WITH A MARKET CAPITALIZATION GREATER THAN $1,000,000,000
AND ITS SUBSIDIARIES BE HELD ACCOUNTABLE FOR ANY TORTIOUS OR OTHERWISE
UNLAWFUL CONDUCT ON THE PART OF THE ENTITY OR SUBSIDIARY THAT HAS
CONTRIBUTED TO CLIMATE CHANGE, INCLUDING ASSOCIATED ENVIRONMENTAL
AND OTHER HARMS CAUSED, WHETHER THROUGH FRAUD, DECEPTION, OR ANY
OTHER MECHANISM, ACTION, INACTION, OR PRACTICE.
(B) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INVESTIGATE, COMMENCE, AND
PROSECUTE OR DEFEND ANY CIVIL OR CRIMINAL SUIT OR ACTION THAT HOLDS
ACCOUNTABLE A PUBLICLY TRADED ENTITY THAT DERIVES AT LEAST 50% OF ITS
REVENUES FROM COAL, OIL, OR GAS WITH A MARKET CAPITALIZATION GREATER
THAN $1,000,000,000 OR ITS SUBSIDIARIES FOR ANY TORTIOUS OR OTHERWISE
UNLAWFUL CONDUCT ON THE PART OF THE ENTITY OR SUBSIDIARY THAT HAS
CONTRIBUTED TO CLIMATE CHANGE THROUGH FRAUD, DECEPTION, OR ANY OTHER
MECHANISM, ACTION, INACTION, OR PRACTICE.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY HIRE OUTSIDE COUNSEL ON A
CONTINGENCY FEE BASIS TO ASSIST WITH AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE

HOUSE BILL 340 3
ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES THAT HIRING OUTSIDE COUNSEL ON SUCH A
BASIS IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE.
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 14. CLIMATE CHANGE RESTITUTION FUND AND ADVISORY COUNCIL.
14–1401.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COUNCIL” MEANS THE CLIMATE CHANGE RESTITUTION FUND
ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE CLIMATE CHANGE RESTITUTION FUND.
(D) “SALTWATER INTRUSION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–1001 OF
THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
(E) “VECTORBORNE PATHOGEN” MEANS A GERM OR PARASITE THAT IS
SPREAD TO HUMANS AND OTHER ANIMALS BY A VECTOR, SUCH AS A MOSQUITO,
TICK, OR FLEA.
(F) “WATERBORNE PATHOGEN” MEANS A MICROORGANISM, SUCH AS
BACTERIA, A VIRUS, A PARASITE, OR AN AMOEBA, THAT CAN CAUSE ILLNESS IN
HUMANS AND ANIMALS IF EXPOSED TO WATER CONTAMINATED BY THE
MICROORGANISM.
14–1402.
(A) THERE IS A CLIMATE CHANGE RESTITUTION FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PAY FOR PROGRAMS THAT PREVENT,
MITIGATE, OR REPAIR HARMS CAUSED BY CLIMATE CHANGE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.

HOUSE BILL 340
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) ALL REVENUES RECEIVED BY THE STATE RESULTING DIRECTLY
OR INDIRECTLY FROM ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST OR SETTLEMENT WITH AN ENTITY
IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER § 1–307 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO:
(1) PAY FOR PROGRAMS THAT PREVENT, MITIGATE, OR REPAIR
HARMS CAUSED BY CLIMATE CHANGE, INCLUDING PROGRAMS ADDRESSING:
(I) AIR POLLUTION;
(II) DANGEROUSLY HIGH TEMPERATURES, SUCH AS URBAN
HEAT ISLANDS OR EXTENDED HEAT WAVES;
(III) DROUGHT;
(IV) ECOSYSTEM CHANGES;
(V) FLOODING;
(VI) SALTWATER INTRUSION;
(VII) STORM DAMAGE;
(VIII) VECTORBORNE PATHOGENS;
(IX) WATERBORNE PATHOGENS; AND
(X) WILDFIRES; AND
(2) PAY ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES RELATED TO:
(I) THE DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS TO PROGRAMS UNDER ITEM
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) THE COUNCIL.

HOUSE BILL 340 5
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR PROGRAMS THAT PREVENT,
MITIGATE, OR REPAIR HARMS CAUSED BY CLIMATE CHANGE IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO
AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD
BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE PROGRAMS.
14–1403.
(A) THERE IS A CLIMATE CHANGE RESTITUTION FUND ADVISORY
COUNCIL IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE COUNCIL IS TO PROVIDE INFORMATION TO THE
GOVERNOR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON CLIMATE
CHANGE AND THE DISTRIBUTION OF THE FUND.
(C) (1) THE COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED
BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(II) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED
BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(III) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S
DESIGNEE;
(IV) THE CHIEF RESILIENCE OFFICER, OR THE CHIEF
RESILIENCE OFFICER’S DESIGNEE;
(V) THE SECRETARY OF AGRICULTURE, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(VI) THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;

HOUSE BILL 340
(VII) THE SECRETARY OF THE ENVIRONMENT, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(VIII) THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(IX) THE SECRETARY OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(X) THE SECRETARY OF NATURAL RESOURCES, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(XI) THE SECRETARY OF TRANSPORTATION, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE; AND
(XII) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM EACH OF THE FOLLOWING
ENTITIES:
1. THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF COUNTIES,
DESIGNATED BY THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF COUNTIES;
2. THE MARYLAND CHAMBER OF COMMERCE,
DESIGNATED BY THE MARYLAND CHAMBER OF COMMERCE;
3. THE MARYLAND FARM BUREAU, DESIGNATED BY THE
MARYLAND FARM BUREAU; AND
4. THE MARYLAND MUNICIPAL LEAGUE, DESIGNATED
BY THE MARYLAND MUNICIPAL LEAGUE.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE
COUNCIL SHALL REFLECT THE GENDER, RACIAL, ETHNIC, AND GEOGRAPHIC
DIVERSITY OF THE STATE.
(D) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 2 YEARS.
(2) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(3) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REMAINDER OF THAT TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED
AND QUALIFIES.

HOUSE BILL 340 7
(4) A MEMBER MAY BE APPOINTED TO MORE THAN TWO
CONSECUTIVE TERMS.
(E) THE CHIEF RESILIENCE OFFICER, OR THE CHIEF RESILIENCE
OFFICER’S DESIGNEE, SHALL SERVE AS CHAIR OF THE COUNCIL.
(F) THE OFFICE OF RESILIENCE IN THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE
STAFF FOR THE COUNCIL.
(G) (1) THE COUNCIL SHALL:
(I) MEET AT THE CHAIR’S REQUEST; AND
(II) PROVIDE A METHOD FOR PUBLIC COMMENT.
(2) A SIMPLE MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS THEN SERVING ON THE
COUNCIL SHALL CONSTITUTE A QUORUM.
(3) A MAJORITY VOTE OF THE FULL COUNCIL IS NECESSARY TO
APPROVE ANY ACTION.
(4) THE COUNCIL MAY ADOPT PROCEDURES NECESSARY TO
CONDUCT BUSINESS, INCLUDING THE CREATION OF COMMITTEES.
(H) A MEMBER OF THE COUNCIL:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COUNCIL; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) (1) THE COUNCIL SHALL DEVELOP A REPORT IDENTIFYING:
(I) THE CONSEQUENCES OF CLIMATE CHANGE WITHIN
MARYLAND;
(II) THE GEOGRAPHIC AREAS AND ECONOMIC SECTORS WITHIN
THE STATE LIKELY TO BE IMPACTED BY CLIMATE CHANGE;
(III) THE CONSEQUENCES OF CLIMATE CHANGE ON THE
GEOGRAPHIC AREAS AND ECONOMIC SECTORS IDENTIFIED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS

HOUSE BILL 340
PARAGRAPH;
(IV) ANY OTHER DISRUPTIONS, DAMAGES, OR HARMS LIKELY TO
BE CAUSED BY CLIMATE CHANGE, INCLUDING:
1. ECONOMIC HARMS;
2. ECOSYSTEM CHANGES;
3. ENVIRONMENTAL HARMS;
4. HEALTH–RELATED HARMS; AND
5. INFRASTRUCTURE HARMS; AND
(V) METHODS TO PREVENT, MITIGATE, OR REPAIR THE LIKELY
DISRUPTIONS, DAMAGES, OR HARMS CAUSED BY CLIMATE CHANGE.
(2) (I) THE REPORT SHALL BE:
1. COMPLETED:
A. WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER ANY LEGAL FILING UNDER §
1–307 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE; OR
B. EARLIER THAN THE TIME SPECIFIED IN ITEM A OF
THIS ITEM IF REQUESTED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL; AND
2. UPDATED ANNUALLY IF THERE ARE:
A. ACTIVE CASES THAT HAVE BEEN BROUGHT UNDER
§ 1–307 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE; OR
B. UNALLOCATED FUNDS IN THE FUND.
(II) THE COUNCIL SHALL SUBMIT THE REPORT TO:
1. THE GOVERNOR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY; AND
2. THE DEPARTMENT FOR POSTING ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.

HOUSE BILL 340 9
(J) (1) BY NOVEMBER 1 OF ANY YEAR IN WHICH THERE ARE
UNALLOCATED FUNDS IN THE FUND, THE COUNCIL SHALL DEVELOP AN ADDITIONAL
REPORT RECOMMENDING:
(I) METHODS FOR THE DISTRIBUTION OF THE UNALLOCATED
FUNDS BASED ON THE GEOGRAPHIC AREAS AND ECONOMIC SECTORS IDENTIFIED IN
THE REPORT DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING
DISTRIBUTIONS TO STATE AGENCIES AND LOCAL JURISDICTIONS; AND
(II) UPDATES TO THE METHODS IDENTIFIED IN SUBSECTION
(I)(1)(V) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COUNCIL SHALL SUBMIT THE ADDITIONAL REPORT TO:
(I) THE GOVERNOR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY; AND
(II) THE DEPARTMENT FOR POSTING ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE CLIMATE CHANGE RESTITUTION FUND.

HOUSE BILL 340
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.